test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-all_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/aANlyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/aANlyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  
  Noun - amiskw - ok : # -m animate noun, beaver # quite unsure about the diminutives
     amisk+N+AN+Sg: amisk
     amisk+N+AN+Pl: amiskwak
     amisk+N+AN+Loc: amiskohk
     amisk+N+AN+Sg+Obv: amiskwa
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg: [amiskos, amiskosis] 
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl: [amiskosak, amiskosisak]
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Loc: [amiskosihk, amiskosisihk]
     
     amisk+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: nitamiskom
     amisk+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kitamiskom
     amisk+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: otamiskoma
     amisk+N+AN+Sg+Px4Sg+Obv: otamiskomiyiwa
     amisk+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: nitamiskominân
     amisk+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kitamiskominaw
     amisk+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kitamiskomiwâw
     amisk+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: otamiskomiwâwa
     amisk+N+AN+Sg+Px4Pl+Obv: otamiskomiyiwa
     
     amisk+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: nitamiskomak
     amisk+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kitamiskomak
     amisk+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: otamiskoma
     amisk+N+AN+Pl+Px4Sg+Obv: otamiskomiyiwa
     amisk+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: nitamiskominânak
     amisk+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kitamiskominawak
     amisk+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kitamiskomiwâwak
     amisk+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: otamiskomiwâwa
     amisk+N+AN+Pl+Px4Pl+Obv: otamiskomiyiwa
     
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: nicamiskomis 
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kicamiskomis
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: ocamiskomisa
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px4Sg+Obv: ocamiskomisiyiwa
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: nicamiskomisinân
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kicamiskomisinaw
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kicamiskomisiwâw
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: ocamiskomisiwâwa
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px4Pl+Obv: ocamiskomisiyiwa
     
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: nicamiskomisak
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kicamiskomisak
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: ocamiskomisa
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px4Sg+Obv: ocamiskomisiyiwa
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: nicamiskomisinânak
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kicamiskomisinawak
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kicamiskomisiwâwak
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: ocamiskomisiwâwa
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px4Pl+Obv: ocamiskomisiyiwa
     
     amisk+N+AN+Px1Sg+Loc: nitamiskomihk
     amisk+N+AN+Px2Sg+Loc: kitamiskomihk
     amisk+N+AN+Px3Sg+Loc: otamiskomihk
     amisk+N+AN+Px4Sg+Loc: otamiskomiyihk
     amisk+N+AN+Px1Pl+Loc: nitamiskominâhk
     amisk+N+AN+Px12Pl+Loc: kitamiskominâhk
     amisk+N+AN+Px2Pl+Loc: kitamiskomiwâhk
     amisk+N+AN+Px3Pl+Loc: otamiskomiwâhk
     amisk+N+AN+Px4Pl+Loc: otamiskomiyihk

     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px1Sg+Loc: nicamiskomisihk
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px2Sg+Loc: kicamiskomisihk
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px3Sg+Loc: ocamiskomisihk
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px4Sg+Loc: ocamiskomisiyihk
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px1Pl+Loc: nicamiskomisinâhk
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px12Pl+Loc: kicamiskomisinâhk
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px2Pl+Loc: kicamiskomisiwâhk
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px3Pl+Loc: ocamiskomisiwâhk
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px4Pl+Loc: ocamiskomisiyihk
     
  
  Noun - anikwacâs - ok : # -m animate noun, squirrel
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Sg: anikwacâs
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Pl: anikwacâsak
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Loc: anikwacâsihk
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Sg+Obv: anikwacâsa
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg: anikwacâsis
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl: anikwacâsisak
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Loc: anikwacâsisihk

     anikwacâs+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: nitanikwacâsim
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kitanikwacâsim
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: otanikwacâsima
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Sg+Px4Sg+Obv: otanikwacâsimiyiwa
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: nitanikwacâsiminân
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kitanikwacâsiminaw
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kitanikwacâsimiwâw
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: otanikwacâsimiwâwa
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Sg+Px4Pl+Obv: otanikwacâsimiyiwa
     
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: nitanikwacâsimak
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kitanikwacâsimak
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: otanikwacâsima
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Pl+Px4Sg+Obv: otanikwacâsimiyiwa
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: nitanikwacâsiminânak
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kitanikwacâsiminawak
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kitanikwacâsimiwâwak
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: otanikwacâsimiwâwa
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Pl+Px4Pl+Obv: otanikwacâsimiyiwa

     anikwacâs+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: nicanikwacâsimis
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kicanikwacâsimis
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: ocanikwacâsimisa
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px4Sg+Obv: ocanikwacâsimisiyiwa
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: nicanikwacâsimisinân
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kicanikwacâsimisinaw
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kicanikwacâsimisiwâw
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: ocanikwacâsimisiwâwa
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px4Pl+Obv: ocanikwacâsimisiyiwa

     anikwacâs+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: nicanikwacâsimisak
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg:  kicanikwacâsimisak
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: ocanikwacâsimisa
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px4Sg+Obv: ocanikwacâsimisiyiwa
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: nicanikwacâsimisinânak
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kicanikwacâsimisinawak

     anikwacâs+N+AN+Px1Sg+Loc: nitanikwacâsimihk
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Px2Sg+Loc: kitanikwacâsimihk
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Px3Sg+Loc: otanikwacâsimihk
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Px4Sg+Loc: otanikwacâsimiyihk
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Px1Pl+Loc: nitanikwacâsiminâhk
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Px12Pl+Loc: kitanikwacâsiminâhk
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Px2Pl+Loc: kitanikwacâsimiwâhk
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Px3Pl+Loc: otanikwacâsimiwâhk 
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Px4Pl+Loc: otanikwacâsimiyihk

     anikwacâs+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px1Sg+Loc: nicanikwacâsimisihk
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px2Sg+Loc: kicanikwacâsimisihk
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px3Sg+Loc: ocanikwacâsimisihk
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px4Sg+Loc: ocanikwacâsimisiyihk
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px1Pl+Loc: nicanikwacâsimisinâhk
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px12Pl+Loc: kicanikwacâsimisinâhk
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px2Pl+Loc: kicanikwacâsimisiwâhk
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px3Pl+Loc: ocanikwacâsimisiwâhk
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px4Pl+Loc: ocanikwacâsimisiyihk
  
  Noun - asikan - ok : # -m animate noun, sock paradigm from Okisis p. 133
     asikan+N+AN+Sg: asikan
     asikan+N+AN+Pl: asikanak
     asikan+N+AN+Loc: asikanihk
     asikan+N+AN+Sg+Obv: asikana
     asikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg: [asikanisis, asikanis]
     asikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl: [asikanisisak, asikanisak]
     asikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Loc: [asikanisisihk, asikanisihk]
          
     asikan+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: nitasikan
     asikan+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kitasikan
     asikan+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: otasikana
     asikan+N+AN+Sg+Px4Sg+Obv: otasikaniyiwa
     asikan+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: nitasikaninân
     asikan+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kitasikaninaw
     asikan+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kitasikaniwâw
     asikan+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: otasikaniwâwa
     asikan+N+AN+Sg+Px4Pl+Obv: otasikaniyiwa
          
     asikan+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: nitasikanak
     asikan+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kitasikanak
     asikan+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: otasikana
     asikan+N+AN+Pl+Px4Sg+Obv: otasikaniyiwa
     asikan+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: nitasikaninânak
     asikan+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kitasikaninawak
     asikan+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kitasikaniwâwak
     asikan+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: otasikaniwâwa
     asikan+N+AN+Pl+Px4Pl+Obv: otasikaniyiwa
     
     asikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: [nicasikanisis, nicasikanis]
     asikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: [kicasikanisis, kicasikanis]
     asikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: [ocasikanisisa, ocasikanisa]
     asikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px4Sg+Obv: [ocasikanisisiyiwa, ocasikanisiyiwa]
     asikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: [nicasikanisisinân, nicasikanisinân]
     asikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: [kicasikanisisinaw, kicasikanisinaw]
     asikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: [kicasikanisisiwâw, kicasikanisiwâw]
     asikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: [ocasikanisisiwâwa, ocasikanisiwâwa]
     asikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px4Pl+Obv: [ocasikanisisiyiwa, ocasikanisiyiwa]

     asikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: [nicasikanisisak, nicasikanisak]
     asikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: [kicasikanisisak, kicasikanisak]
     asikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: [ocasikanisisa, ocasikanisa]
     asikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px4Sg+Obv: [ocasikanisisiyiwa, ocasikanisiyiwa]
     asikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: [nicasikanisisinânak, nicasikanisinânak]
     asikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: [kicasikanisisinawak, kicasikanisinawak]
     asikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: [kicasikanisisiwâwak, kicasikanisiwâwak]
     asikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: [ocasikanisisiwâwa, ocasikanisiwâwa]
     asikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px4Pl+Obv: [ocasikanisisiyiwa, ocasikanisiyiwa]
     
     asikan+N+AN+Px1Sg+Loc: nitasikanihk
     asikan+N+AN+Px2Sg+Loc: kitasikanihk
     asikan+N+AN+Px3Sg+Loc: otasikanihk
     asikan+N+AN+Px4Sg+Loc: otasikaniyihk
     asikan+N+AN+Px1Pl+Loc: nitasikaninâhk
     asikan+N+AN+Px12Pl+Loc: kitasikaninâhk
     asikan+N+AN+Px2Pl+Loc: kitasikaniwâhk
     asikan+N+AN+Px3Pl+Loc: otasikaniwâhk
     asikan+N+AN+Px4Pl+Loc: otasikaniyihk

     asikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px1Sg+Loc: [nicasikanisisihk, nicasikanisihk]
     asikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px2Sg+Loc: [kicasikanisisihk, kicasikanisihk]
     asikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px3Sg+Loc: [ocasikanisisihk, ocasikanisihk]
     asikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px4Sg+Loc: [ocasikanisisiyihk, ocasikanisiyihk]
     asikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px1Pl+Loc: [nicasikanisisinâhk, nicasikanisinâhk]
     asikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px12Pl+Loc: [kicasikanisisinâhk, kicasikanisinâhk]
     asikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px2Pl+Loc: [kicasikanisisiwâhk, kicasikanisiwâhk]
     asikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px3Pl+Loc: [ocasikanisisiwâhk, ocasikanisiwâhk]
     asikan+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px4Pl+Loc: [ocasikanisisiyihk, ocasikanisiyihk]

     

  
  Noun - askêkinw - ok : # -m inanimate noun, rawhide
     askêkin+N+IN+Sg: askêkin
     askêkin+N+IN+Sg+Px1Sg: nitaskêkin
     askêkin+N+IN+Sg+Px2Sg: kitaskêkin
     askêkin+N+IN+Sg+Px1Pl: nitaskêkinonân
     askêkin+N+IN+Sg+Px12Pl: kitaskêkinonaw
     askêkin+N+IN+Sg+Px2Pl: kitaskêkinowâw
     askêkin+N+IN+Sg+Px3Sg: otaskêkin
     askêkin+N+IN+Sg+Px3Pl: otaskêkinowâw
     askêkin+N+IN+Sg+Px4Pl: otaskêkinoyiw
     
     askêkin+N+IN+Pl: askêkinwa
     askêkin+N+IN+Pl+Px1Sg: nitaskêkinwa
     askêkin+N+IN+Pl+Px2Sg: kitaskêkinwa
     askêkin+N+IN+Pl+Px1Pl: nitaskêkinonâna
     askêkin+N+IN+Pl+Px12Pl: kitaskêkinonawa
     askêkin+N+IN+Pl+Px2Pl: kitaskêkinowâwa
     askêkin+N+IN+Pl+Px3Sg: otaskêkinwa
     askêkin+N+IN+Pl+Px3Pl: otaskêkinowâwa
     askêkin+N+IN+Pl+Px4Pl: otaskêkinoyiwa
     
     askêkin+N+IN+Loc: askêkinohk
     askêkin+N+IN+Px1Sg+Loc: nitaskêkinohk
     askêkin+N+IN+Px2Sg+Loc: kitaskêkinohk
     askêkin+N+IN+Px1Pl+Loc: nitaskêkinonâhk
     askêkin+N+IN+Px12Pl+Loc: kitaskêkinonâhk
     askêkin+N+IN+Px2Pl+Loc: kitaskêkinowâhk
     askêkin+N+IN+Px3Sg+Loc: otaskêkinohk
     askêkin+N+IN+Px3Pl+Loc: otaskêkinowâhk
     askêkin+N+IN+Px4Pl+Loc: otaskêkinoyihk
     
     askêkin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg: [askêkinos, askêkinosis]
     askêkin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl: [askêkinosa, askêkinosisa]
     askêkin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Loc: [askêkinosihk, askêkinosisihk]
     askêkin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px1Sg: [nicaskêkinos, nicaskêkinosis]
     askêkin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px2Sg: [kicaskêkinos, kicaskêkinosis]
     askêkin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px3Sg: [ocaskêkinos, ocaskêkinosis]
     askêkin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px4Sg: [ocaskêkinosiyiw, ocaskêkinosisiyiw]
